Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-6,100.07
Joint city-county building; building commission; accept gifts.

The building commission shall have power to accept gifts, devises, and bequests of real and personal property to carry out the purposes of sections 16-6,100.01 to 16-6,100.07 and, to the extent of the powers conferred upon such board by the provisions of sections 16-6,100.01 to 16-6,100.07, to execute and carry out such conditions as may be annexed to any gift, devises, or bequest.

Laws 1953, c. 32, § 7, p. 122.